Hawaii statutes.
§514B-10
Remedies to be liberally administered. (a) The remedies provided by this chapter shall be liberally
administered to the end that the aggrieved party is put in as good a position
as if the other party had fully performed. Punitive damages may not be
awarded, however, except as specifically provided in this chapter or by other
rule of law.

(b) Any
deed, declaration, bylaw, or condominium map shall be liberally construed to
facilitate the operation of the condominium property regime.

(c) Any right
or obligation declared by this chapter is enforceable by judicial proceeding. [L
2004, c 164, pt of §2; am L 2006, c 273, §4]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next